Maryland, session 2026, HB0236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Commission” means the State Athletic Commission.
(d) (1) “Contest” means a boxing, kick boxing, or wrestling:
(i) competition;
(ii) exhibition;
(iii) match;
(iv) performance; or
– 1 –

Ch. 125 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(v) show.
(2) “Contest” includes a mixed martial arts:
(i) competition;
(ii) match;
(iii) performance; or
(iv) show.
(3) “Contest” does not include a mixed martial arts exhibition.
(e) “Contestant” means an individual who participates in a boxing, professional
kick boxing, amateur kick boxing, professional mixed martial arts, or amateur mixed
martial arts contest.
4–304.1.
(a) Each applicant for a license to participate as a contestant in a contest shall
present documentary evidence, satisfactory to the Commission, that:
(1) within the prior [30–day] 90–DAY period, the applicant has been tested
for the presence of:
(i) antibodies to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV);
(ii) the antigen of virus hepatitis B; and
(iii) antibodies to virus hepatitis C; and
(2) the results of all tests are negative.
(b) Whenever directed by the Commission, an individual who is licensed to
participate as a contestant in a contest shall present documentary evidence, satisfactory to
the Commission, that:
(1) within [30] 90 days prior to participating in a contest, the individual
has been tested for the presence of:
(i) antibodies to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV);
(ii) the antigen of virus hepatitis B; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 125
(iii) antibodies to virus hepatitis C; and
(2) the results of all tests are negative.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –